dev/adverb/adverb.ne.dix
  <!-- वरीपरी; वरीपरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वरीपरी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जता-ततै; जता-ततै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जता-ततै__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछाडी; पछाडी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पछाडी__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अघिल्तिर; अघिल्तिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अघिल्तिर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ध्वारारारा; ध्वारारारा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ध्वारारारा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भनिएझैं; भनिएझैं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भनिएझैं__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ढकमक्क; ढकमक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ढकमक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सँगै; सँगै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सँगै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आक्कल-भुक्कल; आक्कल-भुक्कल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आक्कल-भुक्कल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घण्टाभन्दा; घण्टाभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घण्टाभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भरे; भरे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भरे__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आकण्ठ; आकण्ठ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आकण्ठ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सरदर; सरदर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सरदर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसैवेला; यसैवेला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसैवेला__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नआउञ्जेल; नआउञ्जेल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नआउञ्जेल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झ्वाट्ट; झ्वाट्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झ्वाट्ट__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यहि; त्यहि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यहि__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यहा; त्यहा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्यहा__">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n=""/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साँची; साँची; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साँची__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ढकढक; ढकढक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ढकढक__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठयाप्प; ठयाप्प; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठयाप्प__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- टड्कालै; टड्कालै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="टड्कालै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विश्वयुद्धताका; विश्वयुद्धताका; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विश्वयुद्धताका__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साँचै; साँचै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साँचै__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यथासम्भव; यथासम्भव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यथासम्भव__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लिन्ठिङ्ग; लिन्ठिङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लिन्ठिङ्ग__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मास्तिर; मास्तिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मास्तिर__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मुनि; मुनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मुनि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जुनवेला; जुनवेला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जुनवेला__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थ्याच्च; थ्याच्च; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थ्याच्च__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गाउँभन्दा; गाउँभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गाउँभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झ्वाइँ; झ्वाइँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झ्वाइँ__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बारंबार; बारंबार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बारंबार__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पीडाभन्दा; पीडाभन्दा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पीडाभन्दा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ट्वाक्क; ट्वाक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ट्वाक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रतिवर्ष; प्रतिवर्ष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रतिवर्ष__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उसवेला; उसवेला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उसवेला__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ज्यादा; ज्यादा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ज्यादा__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्वभावत; स्वभावत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्वभावत__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हालसाल; हालसाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हालसाल__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पतपत; पतपत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पतपत__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- येन; येन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="येन__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घुस्रुक्क; घुस्रुक्क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घुस्रुक्क__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- घरिघरि; घरिघरि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="घरिघरि__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="वरीपरी"><i>वरीपरी</i><par n="वरीपरी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जता-ततै"><i>जता-ततै</i><par n="जता-ततै__"/></e>
    <e lm="पछाडी"><i>पछाडी</i><par n="पछाडी__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अघिल्तिर"><i>अघिल्तिर</i><par n="अघिल्तिर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ध्वारारारा"><i>ध्वारारारा</i><par n="ध्वारारारा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भनिएझैं"><i>भनिएझैं</i><par n="भनिएझैं__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ढकमक्क"><i>ढकमक्क</i><par n="ढकमक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सँगै"><i>सँगै</i><par n="सँगै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आक्कल-भुक्कल"><i>आक्कल-भुक्कल</i><par n="आक्कल-भुक्कल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="घण्टाभन्दा"><i>घण्टाभन्दा</i><par n="घण्टाभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भरे"><i>भरे</i><par n="भरे__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आकण्ठ"><i>आकण्ठ</i><par n="आकण्ठ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सरदर"><i>सरदर</i><par n="सरदर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यसैवेला"><i>यसैवेला</i><par n="यसैवेला__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नआउञ्जेल"><i>नआउञ्जेल</i><par n="नआउञ्जेल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="झ्वाट्ट"><i>झ्वाट्ट</i><par n="झ्वाट्ट__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यहि"><i>त्यहि</i><par n="त्यहि__"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यहा"><i>त्यहा</i><par n="त्यहा__"/></e>
    <e lm="साँची"><i>साँची</i><par n="साँची__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ढकढक"><i>ढकढक</i><par n="ढकढक__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ठयाप्प"><i>ठयाप्प</i><par n="ठयाप्प__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="टड्कालै"><i>टड्कालै</i><par n="टड्कालै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="विश्वयुद्धताका"><i>विश्वयुद्धताका</i><par n="विश्वयुद्धताका__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="साँचै"><i>साँचै</i><par n="साँचै__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="यथासम्भव"><i>यथासम्भव</i><par n="यथासम्भव__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लिन्ठिङ्ग"><i>लिन्ठिङ्ग</i><par n="लिन्ठिङ्ग__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मास्तिर"><i>मास्तिर</i><par n="मास्तिर__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मुनि"><i>मुनि</i><par n="मुनि__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जुनवेला"><i>जुनवेला</i><par n="जुनवेला__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="थ्याच्च"><i>थ्याच्च</i><par n="थ्याच्च__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="गाउँभन्दा"><i>गाउँभन्दा</i><par n="गाउँभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="झ्वाइँ"><i>झ्वाइँ</i><par n="झ्वाइँ__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बारंबार"><i>बारंबार</i><par n="बारंबार__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पीडाभन्दा"><i>पीडाभन्दा</i><par n="पीडाभन्दा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ट्वाक्क"><i>ट्वाक्क</i><par n="ट्वाक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रतिवर्ष"><i>प्रतिवर्ष</i><par n="प्रतिवर्ष__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उसवेला"><i>उसवेला</i><par n="उसवेला__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ज्यादा"><i>ज्यादा</i><par n="ज्यादा__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वभावत"><i>स्वभावत</i><par n="स्वभावत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हालसाल"><i>हालसाल</i><par n="हालसाल__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पतपत"><i>पतपत</i><par n="पतपत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="येन"><i>येन</i><par n="येन__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="घुस्रुक्क"><i>घुस्रुक्क</i><par n="घुस्रुक्क__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="घरिघरि"><i>घरिघरि</i><par n="घरिघरि__adv"/></e>
